Virginia statutes. Title 37.2. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
Chapter 1. Definitions.

§ 37.2-100.
Definitions.

As used in this title, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Abuse”
means any act or failure to act by an employee or other person responsible for the care of an individual in a facility or program operated, licensed, or funded by the Department, excluding those operated by the Department of Corrections, that was performed or was failed to be performed knowingly, recklessly, or intentionally, and that caused or might have caused physical or psychological harm, injury, or death to an individual receiving care or treatment for mental illness, developmental disabilities, or substance abuse. Examples of abuse include acts such as:

Rape, sexual assault, or other criminal sexual behavior;

Assault or battery;

Use of language that demeans, threatens, intimidates, or humiliates the individual;

Misuse or misappropriation of the individual’s assets, goods, or property;

Use of excessive force when placing an individual in physical or mechanical restraint;

Use of physical or mechanical restraints on an individual that is not in compliance with federal and state laws, regulations, and policies, professionally accepted standards of practice, or his individualized services plan; and

Use of more restrictive or intensive services or denial of services to punish an individual or that is not consistent with his individualized services plan.“Administrative policy community services board” or “administrative policy board” means the public body organized in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5 (§

37.2-500

et seq.) that is appointed by and accountable to the governing body of each city and county that established it to set policy for and administer the provision of mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services. The “administrative policy community services board” or “administrative policy board” denotes the board, the members of which are appointed pursuant to §

37.2-501

with the powers and duties enumerated in subsection A of §

37.2-504

and §

37.2-505

. Mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services are provided through local government staff or through contracts with other organizations and providers.“Behavioral health authority” or “authority” means a public body and a body corporate and politic organized in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 6 (§

37.2-600

et seq.) that is appointed by and accountable to the governing body of the city or county that established it for the provision of mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services. “Behavioral health authority” or “authority” also includes the organization that provides these services through its own staff or through contracts with other organizations and providers.“Behavioral health services” means the full range of mental health and substance abuse services.“Board” means the State Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.“Community services board” means the public body established pursuant to §

37.2-501

that provides mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services within each city and county that established it; the term “community services board” shall include administrative policy community services boards, operating community services boards, and local government departments with policy-advisory community services boards.“Department” means the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.“Developmental disability” means a severe, chronic disability of an individual that (i) is attributable to a mental or physical impairment, or a combination of mental and physical impairments, other than a sole diagnosis of mental illness; (ii) is manifested before the individual reaches 22 years of age; (iii) is likely to continue indefinitely; (iv) results in substantial functional limitations in three or more of the following areas of major life activity: self-care, receptive and expressive language, learning, mobility, self-direction, capacity for independent living, or economic self-sufficiency; and (v) reflects the individual’s need for a combination and sequence of special interdisciplinary or generic services, individualized supports, or other forms of assistance that are of lifelong or extended duration and are individually planned and coordinated. An individual from birth to age nine, inclusive, who has a substantial developmental delay or specific congenital or acquired condition may be considered to have a developmental disability without meeting three or more of the criteria described in clauses (i) through (v) if the individual, without services and supports, has a high probability of meeting those criteria later in life.“Developmental services” means planned, individualized, and person-centered services and supports provided to individuals with developmental disabilities for the purpose of enabling these individuals to increase their self-determination and independence, obtain employment, participate fully in all aspects of community life, advocate for themselves, and achieve their fullest potential to the greatest extent possible.“Facility” means a state or licensed hospital, training center, psychiatric hospital, or other type of residential or outpatient mental health or developmental services facility. When modified by the word “state,” “facility” means a state hospital or training center operated by the Department, including the buildings and land associated with it.“Family member” means an immediate family member of an individual receiving services or the principal caregiver of that individual. A principal caregiver is a person who acts in the place of an immediate family member, including other relatives and foster care providers, but does not have a proprietary interest in the care of the individual receiving services.“Hospital,” when not modified by the words “state” or “licensed,” means a state hospital and a licensed hospital that provides care and treatment for persons with mental illness.“Individual receiving services” or “individual” means a current direct recipient of public or private mental health, developmental, or substance abuse treatment, rehabilitation, or habilitation services and includes the terms “consumer,” “patient,” “resident,” “recipient,” or “client.”“Intellectual disability” means a disability, originating before the age of 18 years, characterized concurrently by (i) significant subaverage intellectual functioning as demonstrated by performance on a standardized measure of intellectual functioning, administered in conformity with accepted professional practice, that is at least two standard deviations below the mean and (ii) significant limitations in adaptive behavior as expressed in conceptual, social, and practical adaptive skills.“Licensed hospital” means a hospital or institution, including a psychiatric unit of a general hospital, that is licensed pursuant to the provisions of this title.“Mental health services” means planned individualized interventions intended to reduce or ameliorate mental illness or the effects of mental illness through care, treatment, counseling, rehabilitation, medical or psychiatric care, or other supports provided to individuals with mental illness for the purpose of enabling these individuals to increase their self-determination and independence, obtain remunerative employment, participate fully in all aspects of community life, advocate for themselves, and achieve their fullest potential to the greatest extent possible.“Mental illness” means a disorder of thought, mood, emotion, perception, or orientation that significantly impairs judgment, behavior, capacity to recognize reality, or ability to address basic life necessities and requires care and treatment for the health, safety, or recovery of the individual or for the safety of others.“Neglect” means failure by a person or a program or facility operated, licensed, or funded by the Department, excluding those operated by the Department of Corrections, responsible for providing services to do so, including nourishment, treatment, care, goods, or services necessary to the health, safety, or welfare of an individual receiving care or treatment for mental illness, developmental disabilities, or substance abuse.“Operating community services board” or “operating board” means the public body organized in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5 (§

37.2-500

et seq.) that is appointed by and accountable to the governing body of each city and county that established it for the direct provision of mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services. The “operating community services board” or “operating board” denotes the board, the members of which are appointed pursuant to § 37.2-501 with the powers and duties enumerated in subsection A of §

37.2-504

and §

37.2-505

. “Operating community services board” or “operating board” also includes the organization that provides such services, through its own staff or through contracts with other organizations and providers.“Performance contract” means the annual agreement negotiated and entered into by a community services board or behavioral health authority with the Department through which it provides state and federal funds appropriated for mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services to that community services board or behavioral health authority.“Policy-advisory community services board” or “policy-advisory board” means the public body organized in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5 that is appointed by and accountable to the governing body of each city or county that established it to provide advice on policy matters to the local government department that provides mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services pursuant to subsection A of §

37.2-504

and § 37.2-505. The “policy-advisory community services board” or “policy-advisory board” denotes the board, the members of which are appointed pursuant to § 37.2-501 with the powers and duties enumerated in subsection B of §

37.2-504

.“Service area” means the city or county or combination of cities and counties or counties or cities that is served by a community services board or behavioral health authority or the cities and counties that are served by a state facility.“Special justice” means a person appointed by a chief judge of a judicial circuit for the purpose of performing the duties of a judge pursuant to §

37.2-803

.“State hospital” means a hospital, psychiatric institute, or other institution operated by the Department that provides care and treatment for persons with mental illness.“Substance abuse” means the use of drugs, enumerated in the Virginia Drug Control Act (§

54.1-3400

et seq.), without a compelling medical reason or alcohol that (i) results in psychological or physiological dependence or danger to self or others as a function of continued and compulsive use or (ii) results in mental, emotional, or physical impairment that causes socially dysfunctional or socially disordering behavior and (iii), because of such substance abuse, requires care and treatment for the health of the individual. This care and treatment may include counseling, rehabilitation, or medical or psychiatric care.“Training center” means a facility operated by the Department that provides training, habilitation, or other individually focused supports to persons with intellectual disability.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 37-1.1, 37-34.2:1, 37-254.1; 1950, pp. 899, 935; 1954, c. 668; 1958, c. 556; 1960, c. 133; 1964, cc. 483, 640; 1968, c. 477, §

37.1-1

; 1972, cc. 635, 639; 1973, c. 465; 1974, c. 301; 1976, cc. 671, 767, § 37.1-203; 1979, c. 54; 1980, c. 582; 1982, c. 50; 1983, c. 538; 1984, c. 209; 1987, c. 413; 1994, c. 939; 1995, c. 693, § 15.1-1677; 1996, c. 861; 1997, c. 587, § 37.1-243; 1998, cc. 680, 724, §

37.1-1

94.1; 1999, c. 969; 2005, c. 716; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2012, cc. 476, 507; 2015, c. 750; 2017, c. 458.

Transition provisions.

Title 37.1 has been rewritten, primarily as new Title 37.2, by Acts 2005, c. 716, effective October 1, 2005.

In addition to revision by Acts 2005, c. 716, some of the former sections in Title 37.1 were also amended by other acts passed at the 2005 Session. As required by § 30-152, the Code Commission has incorporated these amendments into the new sections.

Where appropriate, the historical citations to former sections have been added to corresponding new sections.

The case notes appearing under new sections were decided under corresponding former sections or under prior law.

Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 2, effective October 1, 2005, provides: “That whenever any of the conditions, requirements, provisions, or contents of any section or chapter of Title 37.1 or any other title of the Code of Virginia as such titles existed prior to October 1, 2005, are transferred in the same or modified form to a new section or chapter of Title 37.2 or any other title of the Code and whenever any such former section or chapter is given a new number in Title 37.2 or any other title, all references to any such former section or chapter of Title 37.1 or other title appearing in this Code shall be construed to apply to the new or renumbered section or chapter containing such conditions, requirements, provisions, contents, or portions thereof.”

Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 3, effective October 1, 2005, provides: “That the regulations of any department or agency affected by the revision of Title 37.1 or such other titles in effect on the effective date of this act shall continue in effect to the extent that they are not in conflict with this act and shall be deemed to be regulations adopted under this act.”

Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 4, effective October 1, 2005, provides: “That this title revision of Title 37.1 as Title 37.2 shall not be construed to require the reappointment of any officer or any member of a board, council, committee, or other appointed body referred to in Title 37.2 and each such officer and member shall continue to serve for the term for which appointed pursuant to the provisions of Title 37.1.”

Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 5, effective October 1, 2005, provides: “That the provisions of § 30-152 of the Code of Virginia shall apply to the codification of Title 37.2 so as to give effect to other laws enacted by the 2005 session of the General Assembly, notwithstanding the delay in the effective date of this act.”

Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 6, effective October 1, 2005, provides: “That the repeal of Title 37.1, effective as of October 1, 2005, shall not affect any act or offense done or committed, or any penalty incurred, or any right established, accrued, or accruing on or before such date, or any proceeding, prosecution, suit, or action pending on that day. Except as otherwise provided in this act, neither the repeal of Title 37.1 nor the enactment of Title 37.2 shall apply to offenses committed prior to October 1, 2005, and prosecution for such offenses shall be governed by the prior law, which is continued in effect for that purpose. For the purpose of this enactment, an offense was committed prior to October 1, 2005, if any of the essential elements of the offense occurred prior thereto.”

Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 7, effective October 1, 2005, provides: “That any notice given, recognizance taken, or process or writ issued before October 1, 2005, shall be valid although given, taken, or to be returned to a day after such date, in like manner as if Title 37.2 had been effective before the same was given, taken, or issued.”

Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 8, effective October 1, 2005, provides: “That if any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, or section of Title 37.2 shall be adjudged in any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, the judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, or section thereof directly involved in the controversy in which the judgment shall have been rendered, and to this end the provisions of Title 37.2 are declared severable.”

Cross references.

As to the Substance Abuse Services Council, see §

2.2-2696

. As to access to assisted living facilities by community services boards and behavioral health agencies, see §

63.2-1801

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2009, cc. 813 and 840, cl. 2 provides: “That the regulations adopted by the State Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services Board in effect on the effective date of this act shall continue in effect until such time as amended or repealed by the State Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.”

Acts 2009, cc. 813 and 840, cl. 3 provides: “That, as of the effective date of this act, the Department of and Office of Inspector General for Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall be deemed the successor in interest to the Department of and Office of Inspector General for Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services to the extent that this act transfers powers and duties. All rights, title and interest in and to any real or tangible personal property vested in the Department of and Office of Inspector General for Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services to the extent that this act transfers powers and duties as of the effective date of this act shall be transferred to and taken as standing in the name of the Department of and Office of Inspector General for Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.”

Effective date.

This title became effective October 1, 2005.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical and substituted “State Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services Board” for “State Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services Board” in the paragraph defining “Board,” “Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “Commissioner of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services” in the paragraph defining “Commissioner,” and “Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services” in the paragraph defining “Department.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “an individual” for “a person,” “individual’s” for “person’s” and “developmental” for “mental retardation” throughout the section; in the definition of “Abuse,” substituted “intellectual disability” for “mental retardation” near the end of the introductory paragraph and “or his individualized” for “or the person’s individualized” near the end of paragraph 6; in the paragraph defining “Behavioral health authority,” inserted “(§

37.2-600

et seq.)” in the first sentence and “these services” for “such services” in the second sentence; added the paragraphs defining “Behavioral health services,” “Developmental services,” “Individual receiving services,” “Intellectual disability” and “Mental health services”; deleted the former definitions of “Consumer” and “Mental retardation”; in the paragraph defining “Family member,” substituted “of an individual receiving services or the principal caregiver of that individual” for “of a consumer or the principal caregiver of a consumer” at the end of the first sentence and “of the individual receiving services” for “of the consumer” at the end of the second sentence; in the paragraph defining “Neglect,” substituted “intellectual disability” for “mental retardation” near the end; in the paragraph defining “Operating community services board,” inserted “(§

37.2-500

et seq.)”; and in the paragraph defining “Training center,” substituted “that provides training, habilitation, or other individually focused supports to persons with intellectual disability” for “for the treatment, training, or habilitation of, persons with mental retardation.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 750 added the definition for “Developmental disability.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 458 substituted “developmental disabilities” for “intellectual disability” throughout the section.

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 5 Parties. § 5.07 Specific Types of Parties — Various Actions; Chapter 18 Juries and Jurors. § 18.04 Who May Serve as Jurors; Chapter 27 Property Actions. § 27.05 Sale, Lease, Etc., of Lands of Persons under a Disability; Chapter 32 Juvenile Domestic Relations Courts; Family Courts; Small Claim Courts; Commissioners in Chancery: Local Rules of Court. § 32.02 Proceedings in Juvenile and Domestic Relations Courts. Friend.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Hospitals and Sanitariums, § 10; 10A M.J. Insane and Other Incompetent Persons, § 4.

§ 37.2-101.
Certified mail; subsequent mail or notices may be sent by regular mail.

Whenever in this title the Board, the Commissioner, or the Department is required to send any mail or notice by certified mail and such mail or notice is sent certified mail, return receipt requested, then any subsequent, identical mail or notice that is sent by the Board, the Commissioner, or the Department may be sent by regular mail.

History.

2011, c. 566.